Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7703
Act; applicability.

The Model Act Regarding Use of Credit Information in Personal Insurance applies to personal insurance and not to commercial insurance. For purposes of the act, personal insurance means private passenger automobile, homeowners, motorcycle, autocycle, mobile homeowners, noncommercial dwelling fire, and boat, personal watercraft, snowmobile, and recreational vehicle insurance policies. Such policies must be individually underwritten for personal, family, or household use. No other type of insurance shall be included as personal insurance for purposes of the act.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 1.